Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-422.02
MAR, defined.

MAR means a medication administration record kept by an assisted-living facility, a nursing facility, or a skilled nursing facility.

Laws 2020, LB1052, § 7.